Illinois, session 104th, HB3751.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by changing Section 605-1032 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1032)8    Sec. 605-1032. Office of Economic Equity and Empowerment.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Eligible not-for-profit corporation" means a 11not-for-profit corporation, as defined in Section 101.80 of 12the General Not For Profit Corporation Act of 1986, that 13primarily serves minorities, women, veterans, or persons with 14a disability. 15    "Employment social enterprise" means a nonprofit or 16for-profit organization that: 17        (1) demonstrates a mission to provide employment and 18    social supports with on-the-job and life skills training 19    to individuals with a barrier to employment; and 20        (2) provides services or produces or assembles goods, 21    or a combination of both. 22    "Office" means the Office of Economic Equity and 23Empowerment.  HB3751 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 12158 SPS 22258 b1    (b) The Office of Economic Equity and Empowerment is 2hereby created within the Department. The Office shall assist 3minority-owned businesses, women-owned businesses, 4veteran-owned businesses, businesses owned by persons with 5disabilities, employment social enterprises, eligible 6not-for-profit corporations, and other underserved communities 7and constituencies through targeted programs, resources, and 8outreach and promotional activities. The Office may engage in 9or conduct the following activities:10        (1) promoting and conducting outreach efforts to 11    ensure access to State and federal funding opportunities, 12    and assisting minority-owned businesses, women-owned 13    businesses, veteran-owned businesses, businesses owned by 14    persons with disabilities, employment social enterprises, 15    eligible not-for-profit corporations, and other 16    underserved communities and constituencies in applying for 17    and receiving loan funds in the State;18        (2) providing and hosting workshops and public forums 19    and engaging in outreach efforts for minority-owned 20    businesses, women-owned businesses, veteran-owned 21    businesses, businesses owned by persons with disabilities, 22    employment social enterprises, and other underserved 23    communities and constituencies to encourage participation 24    in programs under the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 25    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act, and assisting 26    those businesses in becoming designated under that Act and   HB3751 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 12158 SPS 22258 b1    under similar certification programs;2        (3) providing and hosting workshops and public forums 3    and engaging in outreach efforts that assist and educate 4    minority-owned businesses, women-owned businesses, 5    veteran-owned businesses, businesses owned by persons with 6    disabilities, employment social enterprises, eligible 7    not-for-profit corporations, and other underserved 8    communities and constituencies on the process of applying 9    for and becoming certified to apply for State grant funds 10    under the Grant Accountability and Transparency Act;11        (4) providing and hosting workshops and public forums 12    and engaging in outreach efforts that assist and educate 13    aspiring and existing minority-owned businesses, 14    women-owned businesses, veteran-owned businesses, 15    businesses owned by persons with disabilities, employment 16    social enterprises, eligible not-for-profit corporations, 17    and other underserved communities and constituencies with 18    understanding concepts including, but not limited to, 19    business formation and not-for-profit incorporation, 20    business planning, capital access, and marketing a 21    business or not-for-profit corporation;22        (5) administering programs established by the 23    Department or the General Assembly to provide grants to 24    minority-owned businesses, woman-owned businesses, 25    veteran-owned businesses, businesses owned by persons with 26    disabilities, employment social enterprises, eligible   HB3751 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 12158 SPS 22258 b1    not-for-profit corporations, and other underserved 2    communities and constituencies;3        (6) coordinating assistance for minority-owned 4    businesses, woman-owned businesses, veteran-owned 5    businesses, businesses owned by persons with disabilities, 6    employment social enterprises, eligible not-for-profit 7    corporations, and other underserved communities and 8    constituencies with other State agencies;9        (7) providing staff, administration, and related 10    support required to administer this Section; and11        (8) establishing applications, notifications, 12    contracts, and other forms and procedures, and adopting 13    rules deemed necessary and appropriate.14    (c) The Office may use vendors or enter into contracts to 15carry out the purposes of this Section, including, but not 16limited to, engaging employment social enterprises as service 17providers for workforce development, business training, and 18economic empowerment programs.19(Source: P.A. 103-889, eff. 1-1-25.)